Hawaii, session 2025, HB826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201H-     Long-term rental or workforce fee simple housing development; county planning commissions.  Land uses exclusively providing residential housing for long-term rental or workforce fee simple ownership may be permitted by a county planning commission under this section; provided that the project area is: (1)  No larger than one hundred acres; (2)  Immediately adjacent to the urban district and not including the conservation district; (3)  On lands with soils classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating class C, D, E, or U if within the agricultural district; and (4)  Identified on maps for only residential use in a county comprehensive general plan adopted by the respective county council pursuant to section 46-4 within twenty years of the application filing. All applications to the county planning commission shall include written concurrence from the executive director attesting to the executive director's review of the project and agreement that the proposal is solely inclusive of residential housing for long-term rental or workforce fee simple ownership.  Applications shall be reviewed pursuant to the process set forth in section 205-6; provided that section 91-9 shall only apply at the point of county planning commission review.  All agencies may charge a reasonable fee for their respective application reviews and charge all costs necessary for transcription." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2035. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________